Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.1951

Application of exemption from liability for architects and engineers.

For purposes of the liability of an architect or engineer serving as a volunteer emergency worker, the exemption from liability provided under RCW 38.52.195 extends to all damages, so long as the conditions specified in RCW 38.52.195 (1) through (5) occur.

[ 1993 c 206 s 2.]